Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Part 3

State Park Funding

11-3-301. Legislative intent.

It is the legislative intent that people who use the state parks be given the opportunity to voluntarily contribute to the maintenance, renovation, promotion, expansion, recreational and educational programs, and operations of such parks. Each state park shall provide a collection point, box or other suitable arrangement at which park users may make donations to the state park fund, with the exception of those state parks that the commissioner of environment and conservation may certify as not being suitable for the collection of such fee.

Acts 1998, ch. 1083, § 1.

11-3-302. State park fund.

There is created a special agency account in the state general fund to be known as the “state park fund,” hereinafter referred to in this part as the “fund.”

Any fund balance remaining unexpended at the end of a fiscal year in the fund shall be carried forward into the subsequent fiscal year.

Interest accruing on investments and deposits of the state park fund shall be carried forward into the subsequent fiscal year.

Unless otherwise specified in this part, the funds realized from voluntary contributions generated from the operation of state parks under the control or supervision of the division of parks shall be deposited in the fund. No part of the fund shall be diverted to the general fund or any other public fund.

Moneys in the fund shall be invested by the state treasurer in accordance with § 9-4-603. The fund shall be administered by the commissioner of environment and conservation.

Moneys in the fund shall only be expended and obligated in accordance with appropriations made by the general assembly.

Moneys in the fund shall only be expended in accordance with this part.

Any revenues realized from user fees charged by the state parks shall be deposited in a sub-account within the fund which shall be governed by this part except the restriction regarding salaries in § 11-3-304.

Any revenues derived from the payment of fees charged at state parks and any fines, penalties, forfeitures, or contraband allocated to state parks pursuant to state law shall be deposited in the fund.

Acts 1998, ch. 1083, § 3; 2000, ch. 921, §§ 2, 3; 2004, ch. 847, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 847, § 1 provided that the act may be cited as “The State Park Funding Act of 2004.”

11-3-303. Expenditures.

The fund shall be used for expenditures for state parks, including, but not limited to:

The administration of state parks;

The purchase of lands and rights therein suitable for management by the division of state parks;

The renovation, equipment, maintenance and upkeep of managed property and all buildings and structures related thereto;

The construction of suitable buildings, recreational facilities, parking lots, trails, campgrounds, picnic areas, scenic areas, cabins, inns, golf courses, swimming facilities, restaurants, marinas, docks and structures necessary for the use and enjoyment of state parks;

The promotion, advancement and efficient management of state parks and their resources, including educational activities to that end; and

Any other purpose determined by the commissioner of environment and conservation to be necessary or beneficial to implement this title.

Acts 1998, ch. 1083, § 4.

11-3-304. Excluded uses of funds.

No voluntary contributions or donations made pursuant to this part shall be used to pay salaries of employees or administrators of such state parks.

Acts 1998, ch. 1083, § 5.

11-3-305. Self-sufficiency of revenue-generating facilities.

It is the legislative intent that the following types of revenue-generating facilities at state parks shall be self-sufficient by the fiscal year 2007-2008: marinas, campgrounds, golf courses, cabins, gift shops, restaurants and inns. “Self-sufficient” means that the revenue generated at all such facilities collectively is sufficient to cover all of the direct operational costs incurred at those facilities. Nothing in this section shall be construed to automatically require the closing of any park or facility which is not individually self-sufficient.

Acts 2004, ch. 847, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 847, § 1 provided that the act may be cited as “The State Park Funding Act of 2004.”

11-3-306. Application of excess revenues.

If revenues are generated by the facilities named in § 11-3-305 which exceed the needs for self-sufficiency, then they may be applied in priority order, first to other operations at the park where they are located, next to parks containing historic sites or museums or natural areas, and finally to other state parks.

Acts 2004, ch. 847, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 847, § 1 provided that the act may be cited as “The State Park Funding Act of 2004.”

11-3-120. Management plan.